Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.903

Washington State University extension energy program—Plant operations support program.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5801-S.SL) ***

(1) The Washington State University extension energy program shall provide information, technical assistance, and consultation on physical plant operation, maintenance, and construction issues to state and local governments, tribal governments, and nonprofit organizations through its plant operations support program. The Washington State University extension energy program may not enter into facilities design or construction contracts on behalf of state or local government agencies, tribal governments, or nonprofit organizations. The plant operations support program created in this section must be funded by voluntary subscription charges, service fees, and other funding acquired by or provided to Washington State University for such purposes.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose through the 2023-2025 biennium, the Washington State University extension energy program must establish and administer a technical assistance and education program focused on the use of alternative fuel vehicles. Education and assistance may be provided to public agencies, including local governments and other state political subdivisions.

[ 2019 c 287 s 2; 2010 c 37 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 287: "The legislature finds that increasing the rate of adoption of electric vehicles and vessels and other clean alternative fuel vehicles will help to reduce harmful air pollution from exhaust emissions, including greenhouse gas emissions, in the state. The legislature also finds that an increased reliance on greener transit options will help to further reduce harmful air pollution from exhaust emissions. The legislature further finds that support for clean alternative fuel infrastructure can help to increase adoption of green transportation in the state, as noted in a 2015 joint transportation committee report. It is therefore the legislature's intent to drive green vehicle and vessel adoption and increased green transit use by: (1) Establishing and extending tax incentive programs for alternative fuel vehicles and related infrastructure, including for commercial vehicles; (2) providing funding for a capital grant program to assist transit authorities in reducing the carbon output of their fleets; (3) increasing public and private electric utilities' ability to invest in electric vehicle charging infrastructure; (4) establishing a technical assistance program for public agencies within the Washington State University's energy program; (5) funding a pilot program to test methods for facilitating access to alternative fuel vehicles and alternative fuel vehicle infrastructure by low-income residents of the state; (6) funding a study to examine opportunities to provide financing assistance to lower-income residents of the state who would like to purchase an electric vehicle; and (7) establishing a tax incentive program for certain electric vessels." [ 2019 c 287 s 1.]

Effective date—2019 c 287: See note following RCW 82.29A.125.